Illinois, session 104th, SB3157.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Lubricant and Related Product Producer Responsibility Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to provide 7for the safe and proper management of antifreeze, oil-based 8lubricants, grease, engine additives, and other petroleum and 9related fluids typically used in automotive, transportation, 10and mechanical applications, as well as the original packaging 11containing these products, at household hazardous waste 12facilities in the State. In implementing this Act, the board, 13the producer responsibility organization, and any approved 14producer responsibility plan shall maintain and build on the 15existing infrastructure in the State. 16    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:17    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 18Agency.19    "Approved plan" means a producer responsibility plan that 20has been approved by the Agency under Section 55 and that has 21not been revoked by the Agency under Section 125.22        (1) A conditionally approved plan is an approved plan,   SB3157- 2 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1    except as used in Section 55.2        (2) A partially approved plan is not an approved plan.3    "Board" means the governing board under Section 25.4    "Brand" means a name, symbol, word, or mark that 5identifies a covered product rather than its components, and 6attributes the covered product to the owner or licensee of the 7brand as the producer.8    "Collection center" means a secured site that is approved 9by the Agency to be used as a base for household hazardous 10waste collection and that collects covered products as defined 11in this Act.12    "Consumer" means a purchaser, owner, or lessee of a 13covered product, including, without limitation, a person, 14business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit 15organization, or governmental entity.16    "Contact information" means a name, physical address, 17mailing address, email address, and phone number.18    "Covered product" means a nonflammable petroleum-derived 19or synthetic automotive product or other related products, 20including, but not limited to, antifreeze, engine additives, 21engine oils, oil filters, fuel additives, greases, marine 22lubricants, oil-based lubricants, transmission and gear oils, 23two-cycle oils, and other fluids typically used in automotive, 24transportation, and mechanical applications commercially 25available to a nonbusiness consumer and delivered to a 26household hazardous waste facility. "Covered product" includes   SB3157- 3 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1the original packaging for any covered product of up to 15 2gallons that is available to business and nonbusiness 3consumers and sold in the State.4    "Exclusive licensee" means a person holding the exclusive 5right to use a brand in the State in connection with the 6manufacture, sale, or distribution for sale of the covered 7product in or into the State.8    "Household hazardous waste" has the meaning ascribed to 9that term in Section 3 of the Household Hazardous Waste 10Collection Program Act.11    "Lubricant service provider" means a hazardous waste 12transporter registered with the Agency under Section 50.13    "Participant producer" means a producer that is registered 14with the producer responsibility organization.15    "Producer" means:16        (1) A producer is a person who manufactures a covered 17    product and who sells, offers for sale, or distributes a 18    covered product into the State under the person's own name 19    or brand.20        (2) If there is no person in the State who is the 21    producer for purposes of paragraph (1), the producer of 22    the covered product is the owner or exclusive licensee of 23    a brand under which the covered product is sold or 24    distributed into the State.25        (3) If there is no person in the State who is the 26    producer for purposes of paragraph (1) or (2), the   SB3157- 4 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1    producer of the covered product is the person that imports 2    the covered product into the State for sale, distribution, 3    or installation.4        (4) If there is no person in the State who is the 5    producer for purposes of paragraph (1), (2), or (3), the 6    producer of the covered product is the distributor, 7    retailer, dealer, or wholesaler who sells the product in 8    or into the State.9        (5) For purposes of this Act, the sale of a covered 10    product shall be deemed to occur in the State if the 11    covered product is delivered to the consumer in the State.12    "Producer responsibility organization" means an 13organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 14501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and 15that is appointed by one or more producers to act as an agent 16on behalf of the producers to design, submit, administer, and 17implement a producer responsibility plan and the requirements 18of this Act.19    "Producer responsibility plan" means the plan developed by 20a producer responsibility organization for the collection, 21transportation, and the safe and proper management of covered 22products under Sections 55, 60, and 65 and submission to the 23Agency for approval under Section 55.24    "Recycling" means a method, technique, or process designed 25to remove any contaminant from waste so as to render the waste 26reusable, or any process by which materials that would   SB3157- 5 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1otherwise be disposed of or discarded are collected, 2separated, or processed and returned to the economic 3mainstream in the form of raw materials or products.4    "Sell" or "sales" means a transfer of ownership of a 5covered product for consideration, including a remote sale 6conducted through a sales outlet, catalog, website, online 7marketplace, or similar electronic means. "Sell" or "sales" 8includes the purchase of a covered product by a consumer from a 9manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer. 10    Section 15. Producer registration. 11    (a) No later than 90 days after the Agency's approval of 12the producer responsibility organization, each producer shall 13register with the producer responsibility organization.14    (b) No later than 30 days after the producer registers 15with the producer responsibility organization, the producer, 16or the producer responsibility organization on behalf of the 17producer, shall notify the Agency electronically that the 18producer has registered with the producer responsibility 19organization.20    (c) A producer shall register with the producer 21responsibility organization in accordance with the procedures 22and requirements established by the producer responsibility 23organization.24    (d) Upon approval of a producer responsibility plan under 25Section 55, or January 1, 2032, whichever is sooner, a   SB3157- 6 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1producer shall not sell, offer for sale, import, or distribute 2a covered product in the State unless all of the following 3conditions are met:4        (1) the producer is registered with the producer 5    responsibility organization;6        (2) the covered product is accounted for in the 7    producer responsibility plan; and8        (3) the Agency has approved the producer 9    responsibility plan.10    (e) If an entity did not meet the definition of a producer 11and was not subject to this Act, but, at any later point, meets 12the definition of a producer, that entity shall be deemed a 13producer at that point and shall register with the producer 14responsibility organization and otherwise comply with the 15requirements of this Act before beginning to sell, offer for 16sale, import, or distribute a covered product in the State. 17    Section 20. Producer information to the Agency. 18    (a) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this 19Act, a producer shall provide to the Agency, in a form and 20manner established by the Agency, both of the following:21        (1) the producer's contact information; and22        (2) a list of covered products and brands of covered 23    products that the producer sells, distributes for sale, 24    imports for sale, or offers for sale in or into the State.25    (b) A producer shall provide to the Agency updates to the   SB3157- 7 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1information described in subsection (a) on or before January 215 of each year, within 30 days of changes to the contact 3information or list, and upon the Agency's request. 4    Section 25. Producer responsibility organization governing 5board. The producer responsibility organization shall have a 6governing board consisting of participant producers that 7represent the diversity of covered products. 8    Section 30. Revocation of approval of the producer 9responsibility plan. If the Agency determines that the 10producer responsibility organization no longer meets the 11requirements of this Act or fails to implement or administer 12an approved plan in a manner that effectuates the purposes of 13this Act, the Agency may revoke its approval of the producer 14responsibility plan under Section 125 and may approve a 15producer responsibility plan submitted by another producer 16responsibility organization. 17    Section 35. Producer responsibility organization 18notifications to the Agency. The producer responsibility 19organization shall notify the Agency within 30 calendar days 20of any of the following:21        (1) the end of a 3-month period during which the 22    producer responsibility organization unsuccessfully 23    attempted to obtain a fee, records, or information from a   SB3157- 8 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1    participant producer;2        (2) the date that a producer no longer participates in 3    the producer responsibility organization's approved plan; 4    or5        (3) any instance of noncompliance with this Act or 6    rules adopted under this Act by a participant producer. 7    Section 40. Convenient collection and management system. 8Within 24 months of the Agency's approval of the producer 9responsibility organization and its approved plan, the 10producer responsibility organization shall provide a 11convenient collection and management system for covered 12products at no cost to residents. 13    Section 45. Needs assessment. The producer responsibility 14organization may conduct a needs assessment to determine 15appropriate strategies and investments needed to meet the 16requirements of this Act. 17    Section 50. Lubricant service provider registration. A 18lubricant service provider shall:19        (1) provide for the transportation and management of 20    covered materials generated in the State under contractual 21    agreements with a producer responsibility organization or 22    arrangements with other entities that are entered into 23    under an approved producer responsibility plan;  SB3157- 9 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1        (2) if the lubricant service provider is a unit of 2    local government or a political subdivision, provide at 3    least a one-year advance notice to the producer 4    responsibility organization if the unit of local 5    government or political subdivision plans to cease acting 6    as a lubricant service provider; and7        (3) within 12 months of the effective date of this 8    Act, and annually thereafter, a lubricant service provider 9    seeking reimbursement for services provided under an 10    approved producer responsibility plan according to 11    Sections 55, 60, and 65 must register with the Agency by 12    submitting the following information:13            (A) the contact information for a person 14        representing the service provider;15            (B) the address of the service provider; and16            (C) if applicable to services provided, a report 17        of the total amount billed for collection, 18        transportation, and processing of covered materials 19        provided during the preceding calendar year and, when 20        possible, values must be separated for collection, 21        transportation, and processing.22    The Agency shall provide generic summary information 23collected under this Section to an approved producer 24responsibility organization. 25    Section 55. Producer responsibility plans.   SB3157- 10 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1    (a) Within 12 months of the effective date of this Act, the 2producer responsibility organization shall develop and submit 3a proposed producer responsibility plan to the Agency, in a 4form and manner determined by the Agency.5    (b)(1) Within 6 months of receipt of a proposed producer 6responsibility plan, the Agency shall approve, approve in 7part, or disapprove the producer responsibility plan.8    (2) The Agency shall determine a process for approving the 9producer responsibility plan and any other information 10submitted in compliance with this Act.11    (3) Within 6 months of receiving the producer 12responsibility plan, the Agency shall review and approve, 13approve in part, or disapprove the producer responsibility 14plan components related to safe handling, transportation, and 15management of covered products. If the Agency approves in part 16or disapproves any producer responsibility plan components, 17the Agency shall notify the producer responsibility 18organization of changes necessary for plan approval, and the 19producer responsibility organization shall follow the process 20outlined in paragraph (4).21    (4) The Agency shall approve, approve in part, or 22disapprove the producer responsibility plan. In making a 23determination under this subsection, the Agency may solicit 24information from producers, other agencies or departments, or 25stakeholders, as it deems appropriate.26    (c) If the Agency approves a proposed producer   SB3157- 11 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1responsibility plan, a revised producer responsibility plan, 2or a conditionally approved plan, then the Agency shall notify 3the producer responsibility organization of the approval. The 4producer responsibility organization shall implement the 5approved plan within 90 days of receipt of the notice of 6approval, or as otherwise agreed to by the Agency.7    (d) If the Agency disapproves a proposed producer 8responsibility plan or a revised producer responsibility plan, 9then the Agency shall notify the producer responsibility 10organization of the disapproval and specify the reasons for 11disapproval. Within 30 days of receipt of notice of 12disapproval, the producer responsibility organization shall 13submit a revised producer responsibility plan.14    (e)(1) If the Agency approves a proposed producer 15responsibility plan or a revised producer responsibility plan 16in part, then the Agency shall notify the producer 17responsibility organization of the partial approval and 18identify the portions of the producer responsibility plan that 19do not comply with this Act.20    (2) Within 30 days of receipt of the notice of partial 21approval, the producer responsibility organization shall 22submit a revised producer responsibility plan to the Agency.23    (3) The producer responsibility organization shall 24implement the approved parts of the producer responsibility 25plan within 90 days of receipt of the notice of partial 26approval, or as otherwise agreed to by the Agency.  SB3157- 12 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1    (f) Within 30 days of receipt of a revised producer 2responsibility plan, the Agency shall approve, approve in 3part, or disapprove the revised producer responsibility plan.4    (g) If the Agency has not approved, approved in part, or 5disapproved a producer responsibility plan within one year of 6receipt of the producer responsibility plan, then the producer 7responsibility plan shall be deemed conditionally approved and 8the Agency shall notify the producer responsibility 9organization of the conditional approval.10    (h) The Agency may impose additional requirements for any 11portion of a proposed producer responsibility plan, a revised 12producer responsibility plan, or a conditionally approved plan 13that does not comply with this Act and that has not been 14approved.15    (i) When reviewing a proposed producer responsibility 16plan, a revised producer responsibility plan, or a 17conditionally approved plan, the Agency may solicit 18information from producers, other agencies or departments, or 19stakeholders, as the Agency deems appropriate.20    (j) The Agency may review an approved plan or a 21conditionally approved plan at any time. If the Agency finds 22that an approved plan or a conditionally approved plan is 23deficient, then it may recommend modifications.24    (k) Any substantial changes to an approved plan shall be 25submitted to the Agency for approval.26    (l)(1) An approved plan and a conditionally approved plan   SB3157- 13 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1shall be a public record, except that financial, production, 2or sales data reported by the producer responsibility 3organization to the Agency is not a public record and shall not 4be open to public inspection. The Agency may release financial 5or sales data in summary form only so the information cannot be 6attributable to a specific entity.7    (2) The producer responsibility organization may submit to 8the Agency a redacted version of the approved plan or 9conditionally approved plan that removes any proprietary or 10confidential information.11    (3) Within 90 days of approval, conditional approval, or 12revision of a producer responsibility plan, the Agency shall 13post on its website the producer responsibility plan and a 14list of all the participant producers covered by the producer 15responsibility plan.16    (m) Within 24 months of the effective date of this Act, a 17producer responsibility organization shall have a producer 18responsibility plan approved or conditionally approved by the 19Agency, and each producer shall be subject to an approved plan 20or conditionally approved plan. 21    Section 60. Producer responsibility plan requirements. A 22producer responsibility plan shall do all of the following:23        (1) be designed to ensure the safe and convenient 24    collection and management of covered products statewide 25    and to ensure that performance-based standards are met   SB3157- 14 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1    that include performance goals that, at a minimum, shall 2    include the following goal areas:3            (A) statewide covered product collection rate 4        goals; and5            (B) covered products packaging recycling rate 6        goals;7        (2) include strategies to ensure elderly consumers, 8    disabled consumers, and other consumers with limited 9    mobility have access to the safe and proper collection and 10    management of covered products, including opportunities to 11    have covered products collected; collection strategies 12    shall include, but are not limited to:13            (A) a description of how the producer 14        responsibility organization will ensure any covered 15        product with access to collection and recycling 16        services, following plan implementation, will continue 17        to have comparable access through the plan using a 18        methodology for more customized approaches to provide 19        90% of the State's residents access to a permanent 20        drop-off site within 15 miles for free and may include 21        temporary collection sites, in each county of the 22        State;23            (B) a description of how a county with a 24        population more than 50,000 residents, as reported 25        annually by the State Comptroller, shall be provided 26        up to one additional, permanent drop-off site for   SB3157- 15 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1        every 30,000 residents;2            (C) a description of how collection strategies 3        provide for a reasonable geographic spread of 4        permanent collection sites and an explanation for the 5        geographic spread;6            (D) a description of how the producer 7        responsibility organization will collaborate, as 8        necessary, to address automotive container collection 9        needs;10            (E) a description of how the producer 11        responsibility organization will provide a depot 12        search tool on its website including location and 13        operating hours of sites accepting automotive 14        containers; and15            (F) a description of how the producer 16        responsibility organization will approve lubricant and 17        covered material recyclers to fulfill the requirements 18        of the plan;19        (3) include the contact information of each 20    participant producer;21        (4) include a financial section of the plan that 22    demonstrates how the producer responsibility organization 23    will comply with Section 70, including, but not limited 24    to, a 5-year budget that demonstrates how the producer 25    responsibility organization will comply with paragraph (2) 26    of Section 70;  SB3157- 16 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1        (5) include a section describing the producer 2    responsibility organization's contingency plan in the 3    event the producer responsibility plan expires or is 4    revoked; the contingency plan shall guarantee that all the 5    contracts, financial data, and any other necessary 6    authority and assets to operate the program shall vest in 7    a trustee approved by the Agency; the trustee shall 8    operate the most recently approved plan, subject to the 9    direction of the Agency, until the time that a new 10    producer responsibility plan is approved; upon expiration 11    or revocation of the producer responsibility plan, the 12    balance of the producer responsibility organization's 13    operating reserves collected shall be transferred to the 14    control of the trustee within 5 calendar days; all 15    documents, digital records, contracts, and files related 16    to the operation of the producer responsibility plan shall 17    be transferred to the control of the trustee within 5 18    calendar days;19        (6) include a section describing a comprehensive 20    statewide education and outreach program designed to 21    educate consumers and promote participation in the program 22    offered by the producer responsibility organization; the 23    comprehensive statewide education and outreach program 24    shall do all of the following:25            (A) promote the safe and proper management of a 26        covered product and shall not promote the disposal of   SB3157- 17 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1        a covered product in a manner inconsistent with the 2        services offered by the producer responsibility plan; 3        and4            (B) include information for consumers on how to 5        properly manage a covered product at the time of 6        disposal and how to avoid improper disposal of a 7        covered product; and8        (7) include a description on how the producer 9    responsibility organization will leverage and use existing 10    and relevant collection programs and infrastructure. 11    Section 65. Revisions to producer responsibility plan. 12    (a) The producer responsibility organization shall review 13its approved plan at least every 5 years and determine whether 14revisions are necessary.15    (b) If the producer responsibility organization determines 16that revisions to its approved plan are necessary, the 17producer responsibility organization shall submit to the 18Agency a revised producer responsibility plan for review and 19approval using the procedures set forth in Section 55. The 20producer responsibility organization shall submit the revised 21producer responsibility plan to the Agency at least 12 months 22before the review deadline outlined in subsection (a). The 23revised producer responsibility plan shall include a cover 24letter that summarizes the revisions to the producer 25responsibility plan.  SB3157- 18 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1    (c) If the producer responsibility organization determines 2that no revisions to the producer responsibility plan are 3necessary, the producer responsibility organization shall send 4a letter to the Agency 12 months before the review deadline 5outlined in subsection (a) explaining that the producer 6responsibility organization has reviewed the producer 7responsibility plan and determined that no revisions are 8needed. The Agency may disapprove the producer responsibility 9organization's determination within 30 days of receipt of the 10letter if the Agency concludes that the producer 11responsibility organization cannot implement the objectives of 12this Act without revising the producer responsibility plan. If 13the Agency disapproves the producer responsibility 14organization's determination, the Agency may indicate to the 15producer responsibility organization which sections of the 16producer responsibility plan need revision and the producer 17responsibility organization shall submit to the Agency a 18revised producer responsibility plan, or producer 19responsibility plan sections, for review and approval, 20following the procedures set forth in Section 55. The producer 21responsibility organization shall submit the revised producer 22responsibility plan under this subsection within 60 days of 23receipt of the Agency's disapproval.24    (d) The Agency may consult with or submit the revised 25producer responsibility plan to another State agency or 26department if the Agency determines it is necessary for making   SB3157- 19 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1its determination. The duration of time the Agency takes for 2this consultation is not included in the time allotted to the 3Agency for review under this Section. 4    Section 70. Financial duties of the producer 5responsibility organization. The producer responsibility 6organization shall do all of the following:7        (1) establish a method for fully funding its producer 8    responsibility plan in a manner that equitably distributes 9    the producer responsibility plan's costs among participant 10    producers in a manner reflecting sales volumes and adjusts 11    those costs to account for the cost to manage the covered 12    products for which each participant producer is 13    responsible;14        (2) operate on a budget that establishes a funding 15    level sufficient to operate the producer responsibility 16    organization in a prudent and responsible manner; the 17    budget shall demonstrate how the producer responsibility 18    organization's estimated revenues will cover all of the 19    producer responsibility organization's budgeted costs for 20    each cost category; budgeted cost categories shall 21    include, but not be limited to, administrative costs, 22    capital costs, and a reserve;23            (A) administrative costs under this paragraph (2) 24        shall include the actual and reasonable regulatory 25        costs incurred by the Agency, which includes full   SB3157- 20 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1        personnel costs, to implement and enforce this Act 2        upon approval of its producer responsibility plan, 3        except that costs shall include actual and reasonable 4        regulatory development costs and other startup costs 5        incurred before a producer responsibility plan's 6        submittal and approval; and7            (B) the reserve under this paragraph (2) shall 8        include funds to operate the producer responsibility 9        organization if there are unexpected events, losses of 10        income, or large unbudgeted expenses; the reserve 11        shall also protect the infrastructure that the 12        producer responsibility organization relies on in its 13        producer responsibility plan during any lapse in 14        producer participation during the life of the program; 15        the reserve cost category shall include a reserve 16        level amount description justifying the reserve level 17        amount indicated; the producer responsibility 18        organization shall maintain reserve funds sufficient 19        to operate the producer responsibility plan for not 20        less than 6 months; when a new producer responsibility 21        organization is approved by the Agency, the producer 22        responsibility organization shall establish its 23        reserve and maintain the required reserve fund balance 24        by the end of the second year of producer 25        responsibility plan operation; if the producer 26        responsibility plan expires or is revoked, the reserve   SB3157- 21 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1        balance shall be transferred to a successor producer 2        responsibility organization or a trustee under the 3        portion of the producer responsibility plan described 4        in paragraph (5) of Section 60;5        (3) pay, on a schedule determined by the Agency, the 6    Agency fees to cover the Agency's actual and reasonable 7    regulatory costs, as described in Section 80;8        (4) establish a process by which the financial 9    activities of the producer responsibility organization 10    that are related to implementation of the producer 11    responsibility plan will be subject to an independent 12    audit consistent with generally accepted accounting 13    principles;14        (5) provide written certification by an authorized 15    representative of the producer responsibility organization 16    that, at the time of submission to the Agency, all aspects 17    of the producer responsibility plan are in compliance with 18    all applicable state and federal laws and regulations; and19        (6) have adequate financial responsibility and 20    financial controls in place, including fraud prevention 21    measures, to ensure proper management of funds. 22    Section 75. Duties of participant producers to pay costs. 23Each participant producer shall, through the producer 24responsibility organization, pay all administrative and 25operational costs associated with establishing and   SB3157- 22 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1implementing the producer responsibility organization's 2approved plan, including the cost of the collection, 3transportation, and safe and proper management of covered 4products. 5    Section 80. Agency financial duties; Lubricant and Related 6Product Producer Responsibility Fund. 7    (a) Within 4 months of the effective date of this Act, the 8Agency shall notify the producer responsibility organization 9of the estimated costs for the Agency resulting from this Act, 10including administrative and other costs related to 11implementing and enforcing this Act. The costs shall not 12exceed the Agency's actual and reasonable costs to implement 13and enforce this Act.14    (b) The Agency shall deposit all moneys received from the 15producer responsibility organization under this Section into 16the Lubricant and Related Product Producer Responsibility 17Fund, which is hereby created in the State treasury.18    (c) Subject to appropriation, moneys in the Lubricant and 19Related Product Producer Responsibility Fund shall be expended 20only as directed by the Agency to implement and enforce this 21Act. 22    Section 85. Reimbursement of certain lubricant service 23providers. 24    (a) If the producer responsibility plan relies on a unit   SB3157- 23 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1of local government or other governmental or nongovernmental 2entity to collect or manage a covered product or to otherwise 3comply with Section 40, then the producer responsibility 4organization shall reimburse the lubricant service provider 5for the costs associated with the collection and management of 6the covered product under mutually agreed-upon terms.7    (b) Reimbursement under this Section shall be based on 8market costs and the commodity value of covered materials.9    (c) Reimbursement costs under subsection (a) shall be 10limited to the proportional actual costs for covered products 11for collection and management of a covered product by a 12lubricant service provider. The lubricant service provider 13must prorate the costs of services to local government 14entities or private entities that offer collection of covered 15products under this Act to reflect the reimbursements provided 16under this subsection.17    (d) Reimbursement costs under subsection (a) shall include 18costs for transportation from a household hazardous waste 19facility or other collection point or depot and costs for the 20disposal and recycling of a covered product.21    (e) A lubricant service provider seeking reimbursement for 22services provided under an approved producer responsibility 23plan under this Act must submit collection data for covered 24products to the producer responsibility organization at least 25quarterly.26    (f) A lubricant service provider seeking reimbursement for   SB3157- 24 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1services provided under an approved producer responsibility 2plan under this Act must provide the following information to 3the producer responsibility organization:4        (1) a list of the approved lubricant recyclers that 5    received covered products from the lubricant service 6    provider; and7        (2) a list of the kinds of facilities and markets that 8    generated the covered material that the lubricant service 9    provider collected and delivered to an approved recycler.10    (g) Upon appropriate notification from the producer 11responsibility organization, a lubricant service provider must 12provide nonconfidential information to the producer 13responsibility organization to audit the volumes of material 14delivered to recyclers. 15    Section 90. Records, audits, and reports. 16    (a) The producer responsibility organization shall keep 17board minutes, books, and records that clearly reflect the 18activities and transactions of the producer responsibility 19organization for a period of not less than 5 years.20    (b) The Agency may audit the producer responsibility 21organization annually.22    (c) It is a violation of this Act for the producer 23responsibility organization, a participant producer, or their 24agents to fail to produce documents or data that is requested 25by the Agency or required to be collected or generated to carry   SB3157- 25 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1out operation of the producer responsibility plan in the form 2and manner determined by the Agency as part of an Agency audit 3or review of a third-party audit. 4    Section 95. Reports and records duties. 5    (a) A producer and the producer responsibility 6organization shall do both of the following:7        (1) provide the Agency, upon request, with reasonable 8    and timely access, as determined by the Agency, to its 9    facilities and operations, as necessary to determine 10    compliance with this Act; and11        (2) within 14 days of a request from the Agency, 12    provide the Agency with relevant records, as determined by 13    the Agency, as necessary to determine compliance with this 14    Act.15    (b) All reports and records provided to the Agency under 16this Act shall be provided under penalty of perjury.17    (c) The Agency may impose administrative civil penalties 18under this Act on a producer or producer responsibility 19organization that fails to provide the Agency with the access 20required under this Section. 21    Section 100. Audits. 22    (a) The producer responsibility organization shall retain 23an independent certified public accountant, certified in the 24United States, to annually audit the accounting books of the   SB3157- 26 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1producer responsibility organization. The Agency shall review 2the independent certified public accountant's audit for 3compliance with this Act and consistency with the producer 4responsibility organization's approved plan and the annual 5report required by Section 105. After the Agency conducts its 6own review, the Agency shall notify the producer 7responsibility organization of (i) any conduct or practice 8that does not comply with this Act or (ii) any inconsistencies 9identified in the review. The producer responsibility 10organization may obtain copies of the Agency's review, 11including proprietary information contained in the Agency's 12review, upon request. The producer or producer responsibility 13organization may request that the Agency withhold from 14disclosure trade secrets to the extent allowed under the 15Freedom of Information Act.16    (b) The items submitted to the Agency for its review of the 17independent audit shall include all of the following:18        (1) financial statements audited in accordance with 19    generally accepted accounting principles;20        (2) an audit of the producer responsibility 21    organization's compliance with this Act; and22        (3) an audit of the producer responsibility 23    organization's adherence to, execution of, and consistency 24    with its approved plan.25    (c) The producer responsibility organization shall include 26the independent audit in its annual report submitted to the   SB3157- 27 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1Agency under Section 105 commencing within 18 months of the 2producer responsibility plan's approval by the Agency. 3    Section 105. Reports. On or before January 1 of each year, 4the producer responsibility organization shall submit to the 5Agency and make publicly available an annual report, in a 6format prescribed by the Agency, that includes, at minimum, 7all of the following information for the preceding calendar 8year, unless otherwise specified:9        (1) the producer responsibility organization's costs, 10    according to the cost categories established in the 11    producer responsibility plan, and revenues;12        (2) a summary of any anticipated changes to 13    allocations in cost categories for the next calendar year;14        (3) any changes to the distribution of costs to the 15    participant producers;16        (4) updated contact information for participant 17    producers;18        (5) the quantity of covered products sold in or into 19    the State by participant producers as determined by the 20    best available commercial data;21        (6) a summary of efforts made as part of the 22    comprehensive statewide education and outreach program as 23    required by paragraph (6) of Section 60, including the 24    producer responsibility organization's evaluation of the 25    effectiveness of the program;  SB3157- 28 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1        (7) recommendations for any future proposed 2    substantial changes to the producer responsibility plan; 3    and4        (8) any other information required by this Act. 5    Section 110. Report compliance. 6    (a) No later than 120 days after the date the Agency 7receives an annual report under Section 105, the Agency shall 8notify the producer responsibility organization if the annual 9report is compliant or noncompliant.10    (b) If the Agency determines that the annual report is 11noncompliant due to failure to meet the requirements of this 12Act, the Agency may require the resubmittal of the annual 13report and take enforcement action.14    (c) The Agency may consult with or submit the annual 15report to a State agency or department if it determines it is 16necessary to determine the annual report's compliance or 17noncompliance. The time the Agency takes for this consultation 18shall not be included in the time allotted to the Agency for 19review under subsection (a). 20    Section 115. Prohibition. A retailer, dealer, producer, or 21distributor shall not sell, distribute, offer for sale, or 22import a covered product in or into the State unless the 23producer of the covered product is listed as a compliant 24producer under Section 120 or received a certification letter   SB3157- 29 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1described in subsection (e) of Section 120. 2    Section 120. Compliant producers. 3    (a) Within 12 months of the effective date of this Act, and 4on or before July 1 of each year thereafter, the Agency shall 5publish on the Agency's website, a list of the names of 6producers that are compliant with this Act. The Agency shall 7list, as appropriate, the reported brands of covered products 8for each producer.9    (b) A retailer, producer, or distributor shall monitor the 10Agency's website to determine if a producer, brand, or covered 11product is in compliance with this Act.12    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, upon 13identification of a producer that is not registered with the 14producer responsibility organization with an approved plan, 15the Agency shall issue a notice of noncompliance to the 16producer.17    (d) If the Agency determines a producer is not in 18compliance with this Act, the Agency shall remove the producer 19and its brands of covered products from the compliance list on 20the Agency's website.21    (e) The Agency shall provide a certification letter to a 22producer that is not listed on the Agency's website as a 23compliant producer, but that has demonstrated compliance with 24this Act to the Agency. The certification letter shall state 25that the producer is in compliance with this Act. The Agency   SB3157- 30 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1may update the compliance list on its website. 2    Section 125. Penalties. 3    (a) Violations of this Act or rules adopted under this Act 4shall be enforceable by the Agency administratively imposing a 5civil penalty under this Section. Whenever Agency personnel, 6on the basis of direct observation, determine that any person 7has violated any provision of this Act, the Agency may issue 8and serve an administrative citation upon such person within 9not more than 60 days after the date of the observed violation. 10Each administrative citation issued shall be served upon the 11person named therein or such person's authorized agent for 12service of process and shall include the following 13information:14        (1) a statement specifying the provisions of the Act 15    or rules adopted under the Act that the person was 16    observed to violate;17        (2) a copy of the report in which the Agency recorded 18    the violation, which report shall include the date and 19    time of the finding of the violation, and relevant 20    conditions prevailing during the inspection;21        (3) the penalty imposed for the violation;22        (4) instructions for contesting the administrative 23    citation findings, including notification that the person 24    has 35 days within which to file a petition for review 25    before the administrative law judge to contest the   SB3157- 31 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1    administrative citation; and2        (5) an affidavit by the personnel observing the 3    violation, attesting to their material actions and 4    observations.5    The Agency shall file a copy of each administrative 6citation served under this subsection of this Section with an 7administrative law judge of the Agency no later than 10 days 8after the date of service. If the person named in the 9administrative citation fails to petition the administrative 10law judge for review within 35 days from the date of service, 11the administrative law judge shall adopt a final order, which 12shall include the administrative citation and findings of 13violation as alleged in the citation, and shall impose the 14penalty specified. If a petition for review is filed before 15the administrative law judge to contest an administrative 16citation issued under this Section, the Agency shall appear as 17a complainant at a hearing before the administrative law judge 18at a time not less than 21 days after notice of such hearing 19has been sent to the Agency and the person named in the 20citation. In such hearings, the burden of proof shall be on the 21Agency. If, based on the record, the administrative law judge 22finds that the alleged violation occurred, the administrative 23law judge shall adopt a final order that shall include the 24administrative citation and findings of violation as alleged 25in the citation and shall impose the penalty specified. 26However, if the administrative law judge finds that the person   SB3157- 32 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1appealing the citation has shown that the violation resulted 2from uncontrollable circumstances, the administrative law 3judge shall adopt a final order that makes no finding of 4violation and that imposes no penalty.  The Illinois 5Administrative Procedure Act shall apply to any administrative 6citation issued under this Section, except as provided under 7this Section. All final orders issued and entered by the 8administrative law judge under this Section shall be 9enforceable by injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate 10remedy.11    (b) The Agency may administratively impose on any person 12who is in violation of this Act a civil penalty of up to the 13following amounts:14        (1) $10,000 per day; or15        (2) $50,000 per day if the violation is intentional or 16    knowing.17    (c) In assessing or reviewing the amount of a civil 18penalty imposed under subsection (b) for a violation of this 19Act, all of the following shall be considered:20        (1) the nature and extent of the violation;21        (2) the number and severity of the violations;22        (3) the economic effect of the penalty on the 23    violator;24        (4) whether the violator took good faith measures to 25    comply with this Act and the period of time during which 26    these noncompliant actions were taken;  SB3157- 33 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1        (5) the willfulness of the violator's misconduct;2        (6) the deterrent effect that the imposition of the 3    penalty would have on both the violator and the regulated 4    community; and5        (7) any other factor that justice may require.6    (d) Upon a written finding by an administrative law judge 7under this Section that a producer responsibility 8organization, producer, or any other party regulated under 9this Act has not met a material requirement of this Act, in 10addition to any other penalties authorized under this Act, the 11Agency may take one or both of the following actions to ensure 12compliance with the requirements of this Act, after affording 13the producer responsibility organization, producer, or any 14other party regulated under this Act, an opportunity to 15respond to or rebut the finding:16        (1) revoke the producer responsibility organization's 17    approved plan or require the producer responsibility 18    organization to resubmit the producer responsibility plan 19    or producer responsibility plan section; or20        (2) require additional reporting relating to 21    compliance with the material requirements of this Act that 22    were not met.23    (e) The Agency shall deposit all penalties collected under 24this Section into the Lubricant Recycling Penalty Account, 25which is hereby created in the Lubricant and Related Product 26Producer Responsibility Fund. Subject to appropriation, moneys   SB3157- 34 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1in the Lubricant Recycling Penalty Account shall be available 2for expenditure by the Agency for activities related to the 3collection, reuse, and recycling of covered products, grants 4for related purposes, and the administration and enforcement 5of this Act.6    (f) The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act applies to 7hearings conducted under this Act, except as provided under 8this Section, and mandates minimum due process requirements. 9    Section 130. Judicial review; enforcement of judgment. All 10final administrative decisions of the Agency under this Act 11are subject to judicial review under the Administrative Review 12Law and its rules. The term "administrative decision" is 13defined as in Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 14After the time for judicial review under the Administrative 15Review Law, the Agency may apply to the court in the county 16where the penalties, restitution, or other remedy was imposed 17by the Agency, for a judgment to collect any unpaid civil 18penalties or restitution or to enforce any other remedy 19provided by this Act. The application, which shall include a 20certified copy of the final agency order or decision, shall 21constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the 22judgment, and the circuit clerk shall enter the judgment 23immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment 24so entered shall have the same force and effect as, and shall 25be subject to all laws relating to, a judgment in a civil   SB3157- 35 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1action and may be enforced in the same manner as any other 2judgment of the court. The court shall make enforcement of the 3judgment a priority. 4    Section 135. Immunities and exceptions. 5    (a) A manufacturer or representative organization 6participating in a program authorized under this Act shall not 7be liable for any claim of a violation of antitrust, restraint 8of trade, unfair trade practice, or other anticompetitive 9conduct arising from conduct undertaken in accordance with 10this Act or a program authorized under this Act.11    (b) Subsection (a) applies to all of the following actions 12taken by a producer responsibility organization:13        (1) the creation, implementation, or management of a 14    producer responsibility plan approved or conditionally 15    approved by the Agency under Sections 55, 60, and 65 and 16    the determination of the types or quantities of covered 17    products recycled or otherwise managed under the producer 18    responsibility plan;19        (2) the determination of the cost and structure of an 20    approved plan; and21        (3) the establishment, administration, collection, or 22    disbursement of a charge associated with funding the 23    implementation of this Act.24    (c) Subsection (a) does not apply to an agreement that 25does any of the following:  SB3157- 36 -LRB104 16971 BDA 30385 b1        (1) fixes a price of or for covered products;2        (2) fixes the output or production of covered 3    products; or4        (3) restricts the geographic area where, or customers 5    to whom, covered products will be sold. 6    Section 140. Rulemaking. The Agency may adopt any rules 7necessary to implement and administer this Act. 8    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 9Section 5.1038 as follows: 10    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)11    Sec. 5.1038. The Lubricant and Related Product Producer 12Responsibility Fund.